src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls-unacc/N-A-imitaawa_gt-norm-unacc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - imitaawa - ok : # -m animate noun, dog AEW NA1
     imitaawa+NA+Sg: imitaawa
     imitaawa+NA+Pl: imitaiksi
     imitaawa+NA+Obv: imitaayi
     imitaawa+NA+Non: imitai
     
     imitaawa+NA+Px1Sg+Sg: nitomitaama
     imitaawa+NA+Px1Sg+Pl: nitomitaamiksi
     imitaawa+NA+Px1Sg+Obv: nitomitaami
     imitaawa+NA+Px1Sg+Non: nitomitaami
     
     imitaawa+NA+Px1Pl+Sg: nitomitaaminnaana
     imitaawa+NA+Px1Pl+Pl: nitomitaaminnaaniksi
     imitaawa+NA+Px1Pl+Obv: nitomitaaminnaani
     imitaawa+NA+Px1Pl+Non: nitomitaaminnaani

     imitaawa+NA+Px21Pl+Sg: kitomitaaminnoona
     imitaawa+NA+Px21Pl+Pl: kitomitaaminnooniksi
     imitaawa+NA+Px21Pl+Obv: kitomitaaminnooni
     imitaawa+NA+Px21Pl+Non: kitomitaaminnooni

     imitaawa+NA+Px2Sg+Sg: kitomitaama
     imitaawa+NA+Px2Sg+Pl: kitomitaamiksi
     imitaawa+NA+Px2Sg+Obv: kitomitaami
     imitaawa+NA+Px2Sg+Non: kitomitaami

     imitaawa+NA+Px2Pl+Sg: kitomitaamoaawa
     imitaawa+NA+Px2Pl+Pl: kitomitaamoaawaiksi
     imitaawa+NA+Px2Pl+Obv: kitomitaamoaawayi
     imitaawa+NA+Px2Pl+Non: kitomitaamoaawai

     imitaawa+NA+Px3Sg+Obv: otomitaami
     imitaawa+NA+Px3Sg+Pl: otomitaamiksi
     imitaawa+NA+Px3Sg+Non: otomitaami

     imitaawa+NA+Px3Pl+Obv: otomitaamoaawayi
     imitaawa+NA+Px3Pl+Pl: otomitaamoaawaiksi
     imitaawa+NA+Px3Pl+Non: otomitaamoaawai
     
     PS/ksikk+imitaawa+NA+Pl: ksikkomitaiksi
